Florida, session 2026, SB152.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âPresent subsections (11) through (26) of section 23 409.908, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (12) 24 through (27), respectively, and a new subsection (11) is added 25 to that section, to read: 26 409.908âReimbursement of Medicaid providers.âSubject to 27 specific appropriations, the agency shall reimburse Medicaid 28 providers, in accordance with state and federal law, according 29 to methodologies set forth in the rules of the agency and in 30 policy manuals and handbooks incorporated by reference therein. 31 These methodologies may include fee schedules, reimbursement 32 methods based on cost reporting, negotiated fees, competitive 33 bidding pursuant to s. 287.057, and other mechanisms the agency 34 considers efficient and effective for purchasing services or 35 goods on behalf of recipients. If a provider is reimbursed based 36 on cost reporting and submits a cost report late and that cost 37 report would have been used to set a lower reimbursement rate 38 for a rate semester, then the providerâs rate for that semester 39 shall be retroactively calculated using the new cost report, and 40 full payment at the recalculated rate shall be effected 41 retroactively. Medicare-granted extensions for filing cost 42 reports, if applicable, shall also apply to Medicaid cost 43 reports. Payment for Medicaid compensable services made on 44 behalf of Medicaid-eligible persons is subject to the 45 availability of moneys and any limitations or directions 46 provided for in the General Appropriations Act or chapter 216. 47 Further, nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent 48 or limit the agency from adjusting fees, reimbursement rates, 49 lengths of stay, number of visits, or number of services, or 50 making any other adjustments necessary to comply with the 51 availability of moneys and any limitations or directions 52 provided for in the General Appropriations Act, provided the 53 adjustment is consistent with legislative intent. 54 (11)âManaged care plans and providers shall negotiate 55 mutually acceptable rates, methods, and terms of payment. Plans 56 shall pay dentists an amount equal to or higher than the dental 57 payment rates set by the agency. 58 Section 2.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2) of section 59 409.967, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 60 409.967âManaged care plan accountability.â 61 (2)âThe agency shall establish such contract requirements 62 as are necessary for the operation of the statewide managed care 63 program. In addition to any other provisions the agency may deem 64 necessary, the contract must require: 65 (c)âAccess.â 66 1.âThe agency shall establish specific standards for the 67 number, type, and regional distribution of providers in managed 68 care plan networks to ensure access to care for both adults and 69 children. Each plan must maintain a regionwide network of 70 providers in sufficient numbers to meet the access standards for 71 specific medical services for all recipients enrolled in the 72 plan. The exclusive use of mail-order pharmacies may not be 73 sufficient to meet network access standards. Consistent with the 74 standards established by the agency, provider networks may 75 include providers located outside the region. Each plan shall 76 establish and maintain an accurate and complete electronic 77 database of contracted providers, including information about 78 licensure or registration, locations and hours of operation, 79 specialty credentials and other certifications, specific 80 performance indicators, and such other information as the agency 81 deems necessary. The database must be available online to both 82 the agency and the public and have the capability to compare the 83 availability of providers to network adequacy standards and to 84 accept and display feedback from each providerâs patients. Each 85 plan shall submit quarterly reports to the agency identifying 86 the number of enrollees assigned to each primary care provider. 87 The agency shall conduct, or contract for, systematic and 88 continuous testing of the provider network databases maintained 89 by each plan to confirm accuracy, confirm that behavioral health 90 providers are accepting enrollees, and confirm that enrollees 91 have access to behavioral health services. 92 a.âA dentist may appear on the provider network database as 93 an active Medicaid provider only if he or she devotes a minimum 94 average of 20 hours per week of direct patient care at the 95 location where he or she is listed as an active Medicaid 96 provider. 97 b.âA secondary provider network may be published on the 98 database for those providers who offer less than the minimum 99 average of 20 hours per week of direct patient care at the 100 location where they are listed as a provider. 101 c.âA provider may not be listed on the network provider 102 database if he or she offers less than 4 hours per week of 103 direct patient care to beneficiaries of the Medicaid program at 104 the indicated location. 105 d.âSpecialty care providers must be listed separately from 106 general dentists on the network provider database and must be 107 listed under the specialty they provide. 108 e.âIf a group practice or university employs or uses 109 multiple dental providers, each working less than the parameters 110 established in sub-subparagraphs a.-c., that group practice or 111 university must be listed on the network provider database as a 112 single entity provider and may not have each dental provider 113 listed individually. 114 f.âEach provider in the network provider database must 115 indicate what services he or she provides and whether the 116 practice is accepting new patients for each of those services. 117 This information must also specify the location at which the 118 services are provided. Endodontists, oral surgeons, and 119 periodontists must specify the age range for each of the 120 services they provide. 121 g.âTo ensure true adequacy and access of care, dental plans 122 must categorize and report provider availability more 123 specifically, listing which of the following services is 124 provided by each provider, including specialists: 125 (I)âPreventive care. 126 (II)âRestorative care. 127 (III)âConscious sedation, specifying whether nitrous oxide 128 or oral sedation, or both, are offered. 129 (IV)âIn-office anesthesia, specifying whether intravenous 130 sedation or general anesthesia, or both, are offered. 131 (V)âAccess to emergent care, specifying whether the 132 provider has access to an ambulatory surgical center, a general 133 hospital, or a childrenâs hospital. 134 135 If a provider provides any of the services specified in this 136 sub-subparagraph, the dental plan must disclose whether the 137 provider is experienced in and willing to provide such care to 138 patients with intellectual or developmental disabilities and 139 whether there are any age or other limitations on such services. 140 2.âEach managed care plan must publish any prescribed drug 141 formulary or preferred drug list on the planâs website in a 142 manner that is accessible to and searchable by enrollees and 143 providers. The plan must update the list within 24 hours after 144 making a change. Each plan must ensure that the prior 145 authorization process for prescribed drugs is readily accessible 146 to health care providers, including posting appropriate contact 147 information on its website and providing timely responses to 148 providers. For Medicaid recipients diagnosed with hemophilia who 149 have been prescribed anti-hemophilic-factor replacement 150 products, the agency shall provide for those products and 151 hemophilia overlay services through the agencyâs hemophilia 152 disease management program. 153 3.âManaged care plans, and their fiscal agents or 154 intermediaries, must accept prior authorization requests for any 155 service electronically. 156 4.âManaged care plans serving children in the care and 157 custody of the Department of Children and Families must maintain 158 complete medical, dental, and behavioral health encounter 159 information and participate in making such information available 160 to the department or the applicable contracted community-based 161 care lead agency for use in providing comprehensive and 162 coordinated case management. The agency and the department shall 163 establish an interagency agreement to provide guidance for the 164 format, confidentiality, recipient, scope, and method of 165 information to be made available and the deadlines for 166 submission of the data. The scope of information available to 167 the department shall be the data that managed care plans are 168 required to submit to the agency. The agency shall determine the 169 planâs compliance with standards for access to medical, dental, 170 and behavioral health services; the use of medications; and 171 follow-up care followup on all medically necessary services 172 recommended as a result of early and periodic screening, 173 diagnosis, and treatment. 174 Section 3.âSubsection (1) of section 409.9071, Florida 175 Statutes, is amended to read: 176 409.9071âMedicaid provider agreements for school districts 177 certifying state match.â 178 (1)âThe agency shall reimburse school-based services as 179 provided in ss. 409.908(22) and 1011.70 ss. 409.908(21) and 180 1011.70 pursuant to the rehabilitative services option provided 181 under 42 U.S.C. s. 1396d(a)(13). For purposes of this section, 182 billing agent consulting services are considered billing agent 183 services, as that term is used in s. 409.913(10), and, as such, 184 payments to such persons may not be based on amounts for which 185 they bill nor based on the amount a provider receives from the 186 Medicaid program. This provision may not restrict privatization 187 of Medicaid school-based services. Subject to any limitations 188 provided for in the General Appropriations Act, the agency, in 189 compliance with appropriate federal authorization, shall develop 190 policies and procedures and shall allow for certification of 191 state and local education funds that have been provided for 192 school-based services as specified in s. 1011.70 and authorized 193 by a physicianâs order where required by federal Medicaid law. 194 Section 4.âSubsection (3) of section 427.0135, Florida 195 Statutes, is amended to read: 196 427.0135âPurchasing agencies; duties and responsibilities. 197 Each purchasing agency, in carrying out the policies and 198 procedures of the commission, shall: 199 (3)âNot procure transportation disadvantaged services 200 without initially negotiating with the commission, as provided 201 in s. 287.057(3)(e)12., or unless otherwise authorized by 202 statute. If the purchasing agency, after consultation with the 203 commission, determines that it cannot reach mutually acceptable 204 contract terms with the commission, the purchasing agency may 205 contract for the same transportation services provided in a more 206 cost-effective manner and of comparable or higher quality and 207 standards. The Medicaid agency shall implement this subsection 208 in a manner consistent with s. 409.908(19) s. 409.908(18) and as 209 otherwise limited or directed by the General Appropriations Act. 210 Section 5.âSubsections (1) and (5) of section 1011.70, 211 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 212 1011.70âMedicaid certified school funding maximization.â 213 (1)âEach school district, subject to the provisions of ss. 214 409.9071 and 409.908(22) ss. 409.9071 and 409.908(21) and this 215 section, is authorized to certify funds provided for a category 216 of required Medicaid services termed âschool-based services,â 217 which are reimbursable under the federal Medicaid program. Such 218 services shall include, but not be limited to, physical, 219 occupational, and speech therapy services, behavioral health 220 services, mental health services, transportation services, Early 221 Periodic Screening, Diagnosis, and Treatment (EPSDT) 222 administrative outreach for the purpose of determining 223 eligibility for exceptional student education, and any other 224 such services, for the purpose of receiving federal Medicaid 225 financial participation. Certified school funding shall not be 226 available for the following services: 227 (a)âFamily planning. 228 (b)âImmunizations. 229 (c)âPrenatal care. 230 (5)âLab schools, as authorized under s. 1002.32, shall be 231 authorized to participate in the Medicaid certified school match 232 program on the same basis as school districts subject to the 233 provisions of subsections (1)-(4) and ss. 409.9071 and 234 409.908(22) ss. 409.9071 and 409.908(21). 235 Section 6.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 236 made by this act to section 409.967, Florida Statutes, in a 237 reference thereto, paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of section 238 409.966, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 239 409.966âEligible plans; selection.â 240 (3)âQUALITY SELECTION CRITERIA.â 241 (c)âAfter negotiations are conducted, the agency shall 242 select the eligible plans that are determined to be responsive 243 and provide the best value to the state. Preference shall be 244 given to plans that: 245 1.âHave signed contracts with primary and specialty 246 physicians in sufficient numbers to meet the specific standards 247 established pursuant to s. 409.967(2)(c). 248 2.âHave well-defined programs for recognizing patient 249 centered medical homes and providing for increased compensation 250 for recognized medical homes, as defined by the plan. 251 3.âAre organizations that are based in and perform 252 operational functions in this state, in-house or through 253 contractual arrangements, by staff located in this state. Using 254 a tiered approach, the highest number of points shall be awarded 255 to a plan that has all or substantially all of its operational 256 functions performed in the state. The second highest number of 257 points shall be awarded to a plan that has a majority of its 258 operational functions performed in the state. The agency may 259 establish a third tier; however, preference points may not be 260 awarded to plans that perform only community outreach, medical 261 director functions, and state administrative functions in the 262 state. For purposes of this subparagraph, operational functions 263 include corporate headquarters, claims processing, member 264 services, provider relations, utilization and prior 265 authorization, case management, disease and quality functions, 266 and finance and administration. For purposes of this 267 subparagraph, the term âcorporate headquartersâ means the 268 principal office of the organization, which may not be a 269 subsidiary, directly or indirectly through one or more 270 subsidiaries of, or a joint venture with, any other entity whose 271 principal office is not located in the state. 272 4.âHave contracts or other arrangements for cancer disease 273 management programs that have a proven record of clinical 274 efficiencies and cost savings. 275 5.âHave contracts or other arrangements for diabetes 276 disease management programs that have a proven record of 277 clinical efficiencies and cost savings. 278 6.âHave a claims payment process that ensures that claims 279 that are not contested or denied will be promptly paid pursuant 280 to s. 641.3155. 281 Section 7.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 282 made by this act to section 409.967, Florida Statutes, in a 283 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 409.975, Florida 284 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 285 409.975âManaged care plan accountability.âIn addition to 286 the requirements of s. 409.967, plans and providers 287 participating in the managed medical assistance program shall 288 comply with the requirements of this section. 289 (1)âPROVIDER NETWORKS.âManaged care plans must develop and 290 maintain provider networks that meet the medical needs of their 291 enrollees in accordance with standards established pursuant to 292 s. 409.967(2)(c). Except as provided in this section, managed 293 care plans may limit the providers in their networks based on 294 credentials, quality indicators, and price. 295 (a)âPlans must include all providers in the region that are 296 classified by the agency as essential Medicaid providers, unless 297 the agency approves, in writing, an alternative arrangement for 298 securing the types of services offered by the essential 299 providers. Providers are essential for serving Medicaid 300 enrollees if they offer services that are not available from any 301 other provider within a reasonable access standard, or if they 302 provided a substantial share of the total units of a particular 303 service used by Medicaid patients within the region during the 304 last 3 years and the combined capacity of other service 305 providers in the region is insufficient to meet the total needs 306 of the Medicaid patients. The agency may not classify physicians 307 and other practitioners as essential providers. The agency, at a 308 minimum, shall determine which providers in the following 309 categories are essential Medicaid providers: 310 1.âFederally qualified health centers. 311 2.âStatutory teaching hospitals as defined in s. 312 408.07(46). 313 3.âHospitals that are trauma centers as defined in s. 314 395.4001(15). 315 4.âHospitals located at least 25 miles from any other 316 hospital with similar services. 317 318 Managed care plans that have not contracted with all essential 319 providers in the region as of the first date of recipient 320 enrollment, or with whom an essential provider has terminated 321 its contract, must negotiate in good faith with such essential 322 providers for 1 year or until an agreement is reached, whichever 323 is first. Payments for services rendered by a nonparticipating 324 essential provider shall be made at the applicable Medicaid rate 325 as of the first day of the contract between the agency and the 326 plan. A rate schedule for all essential providers shall be 327 attached to the contract between the agency and the plan. After 328 1 year, managed care plans that are unable to contract with 329 essential providers shall notify the agency and propose an 330 alternative arrangement for securing the essential services for 331 Medicaid enrollees. The arrangement must rely on contracts with 332 other participating providers, regardless of whether those 333 providers are located within the same region as the 334 nonparticipating essential service provider. If the alternative 335 arrangement is approved by the agency, payments to 336 nonparticipating essential providers after the date of the 337 agencyâs approval shall equal 90 percent of the applicable 338 Medicaid rate. Except for payment for emergency services, if the 339 alternative arrangement is not approved by the agency, payment 340 to nonparticipating essential providers shall equal 110 percent 341 of the applicable Medicaid rate. 342 (b)âCertain providers are statewide resources and essential 343 providers for all managed care plans in all regions. All managed 344 care plans must include these essential providers in their 345 networks. Statewide essential providers include: 346 1.âFaculty plans of Florida medical schools. 347 2.âRegional perinatal intensive care centers as defined in 348 s. 383.16(2). 349 3.âHospitals licensed as specialty childrenâs hospitals as 350 defined in s. 395.002(28). 351 4.âAccredited and integrated systems serving medically 352 complex children which comprise separately licensed, but 353 commonly owned, health care providers delivering at least the 354 following services: medical group home, in-home and outpatient 355 nursing care and therapies, pharmacy services, durable medical 356 equipment, and Prescribed Pediatric Extended Care. 357 5.âFlorida cancer hospitals that meet the criteria in 42 358 U.S.C. s. 1395ww(d)(1)(B)(v). 359 360 Managed care plans that have not contracted with all statewide 361 essential providers in all regions as of the first date of 362 recipient enrollment must continue to negotiate in good faith. 363 Payments to physicians on the faculty of nonparticipating 364 Florida medical schools shall be made at the applicable Medicaid 365 rate. Payments for services rendered by regional perinatal 366 intensive care centers shall be made at the applicable Medicaid 367 rate as of the first day of the contract between the agency and 368 the plan. Except for payments for emergency services, payments 369 to nonparticipating specialty childrenâs hospitals, and payments 370 to nonparticipating Florida cancer hospitals that meet the 371 criteria in 42 U.S.C. s. 1395ww(d)(1)(B)(v), shall equal the 372 highest rate established by contract between that provider and 373 any other Medicaid managed care plan. 374 (c)âAfter 12 months of active participation in a planâs 375 network, the plan may exclude any essential provider from the 376 network for failure to meet quality or performance criteria. If 377 the plan excludes an essential provider from the plan, the plan 378 must provide written notice to all recipients who have chosen 379 that provider for care. The notice shall be provided at least 30 380 days before the effective date of the exclusion. For purposes of 381 this paragraph, the term âessential providerâ includes providers 382 determined by the agency to be essential Medicaid providers 383 under paragraph (a) and the statewide essential providers 384 specified in paragraph (b). 385 (d)âThe applicable Medicaid rates for emergency services 386 paid by a plan under this section to a provider with which the 387 plan does not have an active contract shall be determined 388 according to s. 409.967(2)(b). 389 (e)âEach managed care plan may offer a network contract to 390 each home medical equipment and supplies provider in the region 391 which meets quality and fraud prevention and detection standards 392 established by the plan and which agrees to accept the lowest 393 price previously negotiated between the plan and another such 394 provider. 395 Section 8.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 396 made by this act to section 409.967, Florida Statutes, in a 397 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of section 398 409.9855, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 399 409.9855âPilot program for individuals with developmental 400 disabilities.â 401 (4)âELIGIBLE PLANS; PLAN SELECTION.â 402 (b)âThe agency shall select, as provided in s. 287.057(1), 403 one plan to participate in the pilot program for each of the two 404 regions. The director of the Agency for Persons with 405 Disabilities or his or her designee must be a member of the 406 negotiating team. 407 1.âThe invitation to negotiate must specify the criteria 408 and the relative weight assigned to each criterion that will be 409 used for determining the acceptability of submitted responses 410 and guiding the selection of the plans with which the agency and 411 the Agency for Persons with Disabilities negotiate. In addition 412 to any other criteria established by the agency, in consultation 413 with the Agency for Persons with Disabilities, the agency shall 414 consider the following factors in the selection of eligible 415 plans: 416 a.âExperience serving similar populations, including the 417 planâs record in achieving specific quality standards with 418 similar populations. 419 b.âEstablishment of community partnerships with providers 420 which create opportunities for reinvestment in community-based 421 services. 422 c.âProvision of additional benefits, particularly 423 behavioral health services, the coordination of dental care, and 424 other initiatives that improve overall well-being. 425 d.âProvision of and capacity to provide mental health 426 therapies and analysis designed to meet the needs of individuals 427 with developmental disabilities. 428 e.âEvidence that an eligible plan has written agreements or 429 signed contracts or has made substantial progress in 430 establishing relationships with providers before submitting its 431 response. 432 f.âExperience in the provision of person-centered planning 433 as described in 42 C.F.R. s. 441.301(c)(1). 434 g.âExperience in robust provider development programs that 435 result in increased availability of Medicaid providers to serve 436 the developmental disabilities community. 437 2.âAfter negotiations are conducted, the agency shall 438 select the eligible plans that are determined to be responsive 439 and provide the best value to the state. Preference must be 440 given to plans that: 441 a.âHave signed contracts in sufficient numbers to meet the 442 specific standards established under s. 409.967(2)(c), including 443 contracts for personal supports, skilled nursing, residential 444 habilitation, adult day training, mental health services, 445 respite care, companion services, and supported employment, as 446 those services are defined in the Florida Medicaid Developmental 447 Disabilities Individual Budgeting Waiver Services Coverage and 448 Limitations Handbook as adopted by reference in rule 59G-13.070, 449 Florida Administrative Code. 450 b.âHave well-defined programs for recognizing patient 451 centered medical homes and providing increased compensation to 452 recognized medical homes, as defined by the plan. 453 c.âHave well-defined programs related to person-centered 454 planning as described in 42 C.F.R. s. 441.301(c)(1). 455 d.âHave robust and innovative programs for provider 456 development and collaboration with the Agency for Persons with 457 Disabilities. 458 Section 9.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.